Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1024.
do enact as follows:SB1024,11Section 1. 30.01 (6w) of the statutes is created to read:SB1024,2,6230.01 (6w) “Wake-enhanced boating” means the operation of a motorboat in a 3manner that intentionally creates or enhances a wake for the purpose of 4wakesurfing, wakeboarding, or similar activities, including through the use of 5ballast tanks, ballast bags, wave-shaping devices, fins, or other mechanisms that 6displace or redirect water to increase wake size.SB1024,27Section 2. 30.695 of the statutes is created to read:SB1024,2,10830.695 Wake-enhanced boating. (1) Restriction. No person may conduct 9wake-enhanced boating on the waters of this state unless all of the following 10conditions are met at all times while the wake-enhanced boating is conducted:SB1024,2,1211(a) The wake-enhanced boating is conducted at least 500 feet away from the 12shoreline.SB1024,2,1413(b) The wake-enhanced boating is conducted in water with a depth of at least 1420 feet.SB1024,3,215(2) Certain operations excluded. This section does not restrict the use of 1water skis or an aquaplane, tube, or similar device if towed by a motorboat that is 2not using a partially or fully engaged wake-enhancing feature.SB1024,3,53(3) Local regulation of boating unaffected. This section does not 4preempt or otherwise affect in any way the authority of a local governmental unit to 5enact more restrictive regulation of wake-enhanced boating under s. 30.77.SB1024,36Section 3. 30.77 (3) (cr) 5. of the statutes is created to read:SB1024,3,10730.77 (3) (cr) 5. Restrictions on wake-enhanced boating, including 8prohibitions on wake-enhanced boating in specified areas; minimum distances from 9shore, structures, or other boats; minimum water depths; time-of-day restrictions; 10and complete prohibitions on certain or all bodies of water.SB1024,411Section 4. 30.77 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB1024,3,191230.77 (5) Civil immunity for local regulation of wake-enhanced 13boating. No suit may be brought against the state or any governmental 14subdivision or agency thereof or against any officer, official, agent, or employee of 15any of those entities that, in good faith, enacts, adopts, or enforces an ordinance 16under this section that imposes restrictions on wake-enhanced boating that are 17more restrictive than those provided under this chapter or rules promulgated by the 18department. Immunity under this subsection does not alter or limit any other 19immunity available under law.SB1024,3,2020